Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 5.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-409
Critical access hospital, defined.

Critical access hospital means a facility (1) with acute care inpatient beds where care or treatment is provided on an outpatient basis or on an inpatient basis to persons for an average period of not more than ninety-six hours and emergency services are provided on a twenty-four-hour basis, (2) which has formal agreements with at least one hospital and other appropriate providers for services such as patient referral and transfer, communications systems, provision of emergency and nonemergency transportation, and backup medical and emergency services, and (3) which is located in a rural area. For purposes of this section, rural area means a county with a population of less than one hundred thousand residents. A facility licensed as a critical access hospital shall have no more than twenty-five acute care inpatient beds.

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 9;

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 42;

Laws 2005, LB 664, § 1;

Laws 2008, LB797, § 5.